Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,118
Class I, II, or III school district; teacherage; tax; election.

A tax to establish a special fund for the building, hiring, or purchasing of a teacherage for the purpose of providing housing facilities for the school employees of any Class I, II, or III district may be levied when authorized by fifty-five percent of the legal voters voting on the proposition. The notice of the proposal to establish such special fund shall include the sum to be raised or the amount of the tax to be levied, the period of years, and the time of its taking effect. If fifty-five percent of the legal voters voting at any such election vote in favor of the proposition, the result of such election shall be certified to the county board which, upon being satisfied that all the requirements have been substantially complied with, shall cause the proceedings to be entered upon the record of the county board and shall make an order that the levy be made in accordance with the election result and collected as other taxes.

Laws 1953, c. 300, § 4, p. 1011;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-542;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 764;

Laws 1997, LB 345, § 42;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 80;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 80.
July 19, 2024